Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.390

Reporting resignation or termination of individual working in child care agency.

Upon resignation or termination with or without cause of any individual working in a child care agency, the child care agency shall report to the department within twenty-four hours if it has knowledge of the following with respect to the individual:

(1) Any charge or conviction for a crime listed in WAC 110-06-0120;

(2) Any other charge or conviction for a crime that could be reasonably related to the individual's suitability to provide care for or have unsupervised access to children or care; or

(3) Any negative action as defined in RCW 43.216.010.

[ 2019 c 470 s 13; 2011 c 295 s 6. Formerly RCW 43.215.371.]